Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3137
Procurement of managed care for long-term
care services and support; request for proposals; restriction.

The Legislature finds that
sufficient planning and meaningful input from stakeholders, including, but
not limited to, service providers and consumers, is critical for establishing
an effective managed care system for medicaid recipients. To ensure the safety
and well-being of the state's most vulnerable population, the Department of
Health and Human Services shall not release a request for proposals relating
to procurement of managed care for long-term care services and
support prior to September 1, 2015.

Laws 2014, LB854, § 1.